District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.17

Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of the District may communicate with a tribunal of another state or foreign country or political subdivision in a record, or by telephone or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding in the other state or foreign country or political subdivision. A tribunal of the District may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal of another state or foreign country or political subdivision.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 316, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 317, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(17), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.16.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.16

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “§ 46-303.16. Communications between tribunals. ”A tribunal of the District may communicate with a tribunal of another state in writing, or by telephone or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws of that state, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding in the other state. A tribunal of the District may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal of another state.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.17 has been recodified as § 46-303.18 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(18).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 317 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

This section is based upon § 317 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (1996 Act).